Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 624, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 190, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 624), is amended to read as follows:


Section 624. A. There is hereby re-created the State Board of


Osteopathic Examiners.


B. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall consist of


eight (8) examiners appointed by the Governor, two of whom shall be


lay persons. The remaining examiners shall be regularly licensed


osteopathic physicians in good standing in this state who have been


so engaged for a period of at least five (5) years immediately prior


to their appointment. The osteopathic physician examiners shall be

Req. No. 1520 Page 1


appointed by the Governor from a list of not less than six names


submitted to the Governor by the Oklahoma Osteopathic Association


annually, and any present member of the Board of Examiners shall be


appointed to fill out the unexpired term. All appointments made to


the Board shall be for terms of seven (7) years. In the event of a


vacancy brought about for any reason, the Governor shall fill the


post so vacated shall be filled from a list of not less than six


names submitted by the Oklahoma Osteopathic Association. In


selecting appointees, the Governor may consider recommendations from


a statewide organization representing osteopathic physicians, a


state chapter of a national organization representing osteopathic


physicians, or other groups or individuals in this state.


C. The Board shall have and use a common seal, and make and


adopt all necessary rules relating to the enforcement of the


provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act. Each Board


member shall receive the daily per diem rate for state employees.


Travel expenses allowed under the State Travel Reimbursement Act


shall also be provided to Board members traveling more than fifty


(50) miles to the location of all regular and special Board


meetings.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1520 DC 1/16/2025 2:36:00 PM



Req. No. 1520 Page 2